Illinois, session 104th, HB3142.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Police Act is amended by adding 5Section 50 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2610/50 new)7    Sec. 50. Unfunded State mandates; police training. 8Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after the 9effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10Assembly, any State mandate regarding the matter of the 11training of Illinois State Police Officers that necessitates 12additional expenditures from the Illinois State Police or any 13State agency shall be void and unenforceable unless the 14General Assembly makes necessary appropriations to implement 15that training mandate. The failure of the General Assembly to 16make necessary appropriations shall relieve the Illinois State 17Police or State agency from the obligation to implement any 18State mandate. 19    Section 10. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 20adding Section 10.27 as follows: 21    (50 ILCS 705/10.27 new)  HB3142- 2 -LRB104 04148 RTM 14172 b1    Sec. 10.27. Unfunded State mandates; police training. 2Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after the 3effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 4Assembly, any State mandate regarding the matter of the 5training of law enforcement officers that necessitates 6additional expenditures from the Illinois Law Enforcement 7Training Standards Board, the Illinois State Police, or any 8State or local law enforcement agency or unit of local 9government shall be void and unenforceable unless the General 10Assembly makes necessary appropriations to implement that 11training mandate. The failure of the General Assembly to make 12necessary appropriations shall relieve the law enforcement 13agency, State agency, or unit of local government of the 14obligation to implement any State mandate.